Hawaii statutes.
§587A-9 Temporary foster custody without
court order. (a) When the department receives protective custody of a
child from the police, the department shall:

(1) Assume temporary foster custody of the child if,
in the discretion of the department, the department determines that the child
is subject to imminent harm while in the custody of the child's family;

(2) Make every reasonable effort to inform the
child's parents of the actions taken, unless doing so would put another person
at risk of harm;

(3) Unless the child is admitted to a hospital or
similar institution, place the child in emergency foster care while the
department conducts an appropriate investigation, with placement preference
being given to an approved relative;

(4) With authorized agencies, make reasonable efforts
to identify and notify all relatives within thirty days of assuming temporary
foster custody of the child; and

(5) Within three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays:

(A) Relinquish temporary foster custody, return
the child to the child's parents, and proceed pursuant to section 587A-11(4), (5),
or (6);

(B) Secure a voluntary placement agreement
from the child's parents to place the child in foster care, and proceed
pursuant to section 587A-11(6) or (8); or

(C) File a petition with the court.

(b) Upon the request of the department and
without regard to parental consent, any physician licensed or authorized to
practice medicine in the State shall perform an examination to determine the
nature and extent of harm or threatened harm to the child under the
department's temporary foster custody. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2016, c
96, §3]

Law Journals and Reviews

Prior law.

Consent for Testing and Treatment of Minors in Hawaii. 13
HBJ, no. 13, at 165 (2009).

Case Notes

Cited: 132 H. 368, 322 P.3d 263 (2014).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next